Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-364
Foreign association, defined.

Foreign association shall mean any firm, company, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation actually engaged in the business of a savings and loan association which is not organized under the laws of this state or of the United States.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 89.